District of Columbia statutes.
44-1005.02

Repealed

Privatization contracts, leases, provider agreements, and procedures requirements

Repealed.

Apr. 18, 1986, D.C. Law 6-108, § 501a
as added Mar. 19, 1994, D.C. Law 10-79, § 3, 40 DCR 8696
Mar. 5, 1996, D.C. Law 11-98, § 502, 43 DCR 5
1981 Ed., § 32-1462.
Temporary Repeal of Section For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 702 of Budget Support Temporary Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 11-78, January 26, 1996, law notification 43 DCR ).